test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-mihkwâw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mihkwâw : :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mihkwâw   # it is red

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mihkwâk   # as it is red
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mihkwâw   # it is red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: mihkwâyiw   # it over there is red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: mihkwâwa   # they are red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: mihkwâyiwa   # they over there are red
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mihkwâk   # as it is red
      PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-mihkwâyik   # as it over there is red
      PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-mihkwâki   # as they are red
      PV/e+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-mihkwâyiki   # as they over there are red
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kî-mihkwâw   # it was red
      PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: kî-mihkwâyiw   # it over there was red
      PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: kî-mihkwâwa   # they were red
      PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: kî-mihkwâyiwa   # they over there were red
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mihkwâk   # as it was red
      PV/e+PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-kî-mihkwâyik   # as it over there was red
      PV/e+PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-mihkwâki   # as they were red
      PV/e+PV/ki+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-kî-mihkwâyiki   # as they over there were red
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wî-mihkwâw   # it is going to be red
      PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: wî-mihkwâyiw   # it over there is going to be red
      PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: wî-mihkwâwa   # they are going to be red
      PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: wî-mihkwâyiwa   # they over there are going to be red
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mihkwâk   # as it is going to be red
      PV/e+PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-wî-mihkwâyik   # as it over there is going to be red
      PV/e+PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-mihkwâki   # as they are going to be red
      PV/e+PV/wi+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-wî-mihkwâyiki   # as they over there are going to be red
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: ka-mihkwâw   # it will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: ka-mihkwâyiw   # it over there will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: ka-mihkwâwa   # they will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: ka-mihkwâyiwa   # they over there will be red
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mihkwâk   # it will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ka-mihkwâyik   # it over there will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ka-mihkwâki   # they will be red
      PV/ka+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ka-mihkwâyiki   # they over there will be red
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mihkwâk   # it is red
      PV/ta+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ta-mihkwâyik   # it over there is red
      PV/ta+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ta-mihkwâki   # they are red
      PV/ta+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ta-mihkwâyiki   # they over there are red
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mihkwâki   # when it is red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mihkwâyiki   # when it over there is red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mihkwâkwâwi   # when they are red
      mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mihkwâyikwâwi   # when they over there are red
      
